dict/kk_KZ.aff
FLAG num
SFX 25 N 57
SFX 25 0 бен/349 .
SFX 25 0 ге/350 .
SFX 25 0 ген .
SFX 25 0 гі/351 .
SFX 25 0 гіз/352 .
SFX 25 0 ді/354 .
SFX 25 0 дік .
SFX 25 0 дің .
SFX 25 0 еді .
SFX 25 0 й/358 .
SFX 25 0 йді/359 .
SFX 25 0 йтін .
SFX 25 0 к .
SFX 25 0 ке .
SFX 25 0 л/362 .
SFX 25 0 лер .
SFX 25 0 леу/363 .
SFX 25 0 лі/364 .
SFX 25 0 лік .
SFX 25 0 ме/365 .
SFX 25 0 мей/366 .
SFX 25 0 мейді .
SFX 25 0 мек .
SFX 25 0 мен .
SFX 25 0 міз .
SFX 25 0 мін .
SFX 25 0 нде/367 .
SFX 25 0 ндегі .
SFX 25 0 не/368 .
SFX 25 0 нен .
SFX 25 0 нші/369 .
SFX 25 0 ні/370 .
SFX 25 0 п/371 .
SFX 25 0 пті/373 .
SFX 25 0 р/374 .
SFX 25 0 с/375 .
SFX 25 0 се/376 .
SFX 25 0 сек .
SFX 25 0 сең .
SFX 25 0 сі/377 .
SFX 25 0 сіз .
SFX 25 0 сің .
SFX 25 0 т/378 .
SFX 25 0 те/379 .
SFX 25 0 тегі/380 .
SFX 25 0 тей/381 .
SFX 25 0 тер/382 .
SFX 25 0 теу/383 .
SFX 25 0 ті/384 .
SFX 25 0 тін/385 .
SFX 25 0 у/387 .
SFX 25 0 уші/388 .
SFX 25 0 ші .
SFX 25 0 іп .
SFX 25 0 ң/399 .
SFX 25 0 ңе/400 .
SFX 25 0 ңіз/401 .

SFX 26 N 36
SFX 26 0 ге/350 .
SFX 26 0 ген .
SFX 26 0 гі/351 .
SFX 26 0 дей .
SFX 26 0 ден .
SFX 26 0 ді/354 .
SFX 26 0 дік .
SFX 26 0 дір/355 .
SFX 26 0 дің .
SFX 26 0 е/356 .
SFX 26 0 еді/357 .
SFX 26 0 етін .
SFX 26 0 ме/365 .
SFX 26 0 мей/366 .
SFX 26 0 мейді .
SFX 26 0 мек .
SFX 26 0 мен .
SFX 26 0 се/376 .
SFX 26 0 сек .
SFX 26 0 сең .
SFX 26 0 сі/377 .
SFX 26 0 те/379 .
SFX 26 0 тер .
SFX 26 0 ті/384 .
SFX 26 0 у/387 .
SFX 26 0 уші/388 .
SFX 26 0 ші/390 .
SFX 26 0 і/391 .
SFX 26 0 іл/392 .
SFX 26 0 ім .
SFX 26 0 ін/394 .
SFX 26 0 іп .
SFX 26 0 іпті .
SFX 26 0 іс/396 .
SFX 26 0 ің/397 .
SFX 26 0 іңіз .

SFX 27 N 39
SFX 27 0 бе/348 .
SFX 27 0 бейді .
SFX 27 0 бек .
SFX 27 0 ге/350 .
SFX 27 0 ген .
SFX 27 0 гі/351 .
SFX 27 0 гіз/352 .
SFX 27 0 де/353 .
SFX 27 0 дей .
SFX 27 0 ді/354 .
SFX 27 0 дік .
SFX 27 0 дір/355 .
SFX 27 0 дің .
SFX 27 0 е/356 .
SFX 27 0 еді .
SFX 27 0 етін .
SFX 27 0 ме/365 .
SFX 27 0 мей/366 .
SFX 27 0 мейді .
SFX 27 0 мек .
SFX 27 0 се/376 .
SFX 27 0 сек .
SFX 27 0 сең .
SFX 27 0 сі/377 .
SFX 27 0 те/379 .
SFX 27 0 тір/386 .
SFX 27 0 у/387 .
SFX 27 0 уші/388 .
SFX 27 0 ше/389 .
SFX 27 0 ші/390 .
SFX 27 0 і .
SFX 27 0 іл/392 .
SFX 27 0 ім/393 .
SFX 27 0 ін/394 .
SFX 27 0 іп/395 .
SFX 27 0 іпті .
SFX 27 0 іс/396 .
SFX 27 0 ің/397 .
SFX 27 0 іңіз/398 .

SFX 28 N 37
SFX 28 0 бе/348 .
SFX 28 0 бейді .
SFX 28 0 бек .
SFX 28 0 бен/349 .
SFX 28 0 ге/350 .
SFX 28 0 ген .
SFX 28 0 гі/351 .
SFX 28 0 де .
SFX 28 0 дегі .
SFX 28 0 дей .
SFX 28 0 ден .
SFX 28 0 дер .
SFX 28 0 дері .
SFX 28 0 ді/354 .
SFX 28 0 дік .
SFX 28 0 дір/355 .
SFX 28 0 дің .
SFX 28 0 е/356 .
SFX 28 0 еді .
SFX 28 0 етін .
SFX 28 0 нің .
SFX 28 0 се/376 .
SFX 28 0 сек .
SFX 28 0 сең .
SFX 28 0 сі/377 .
SFX 28 0 те .
SFX 28 0 у/387 .
SFX 28 0 уші/388 .
SFX 28 0 ше/389 .
SFX 28 0 ші .
SFX 28 0 і/391 .
SFX 28 0 іл/392 .
SFX 28 0 ім/393 .
SFX 28 0 іп .
SFX 28 0 іпті .
SFX 28 0 іс/396 .
SFX 28 0 ің/397 .

SFX 29 N 46
SFX 29 0 е/356 .
SFX 29 0 еді .
SFX 29 0 етін .
SFX 29 0 ке/360 .
SFX 29 0 кен .
SFX 29 0 кіз/361 .
SFX 29 0 пе/372 .
SFX 29 0 пейді .
SFX 29 0 пек .
SFX 29 0 пін .
SFX 29 0 се/376 .
SFX 29 0 сек .
SFX 29 0 сең .
SFX 29 0 сі/377 .
SFX 29 0 те/379 .
SFX 29 0 тей/381 .
SFX 29 0 тен .
SFX 29 0 тер/382 .
SFX 29 0 тері .
SFX 29 0 теу/383 .
SFX 29 0 ті/384 .
SFX 29 0 тік .
SFX 29 0 тір/386 .
SFX 29 0 тің .
SFX 29 0 у/387 .
SFX 29 0 уші/388 .
SFX 29 0 ші .
SFX 29 0 і/391 [^кпқ]
SFX 29 0 іл/392 [^кпқ]
SFX 29 0 ім/393 [^кпқ]
SFX 29 0 іміз .
SFX 29 0 ін/394 [^кпқ]
SFX 29 0 іп/395 [^кпқ]
SFX 29 0 іпті .
SFX 29 0 іс/396 [^кпқ]
SFX 29 0 ің/397 .
SFX 29 0 іңіз/398 .
SFX 29 к гі .
SFX 29 к гіл/402 .
SFX 29 к гім/403 .
SFX 29 к гін/404 .
SFX 29 к гіп .
SFX 29 к гіс/405 .
SFX 29 п бі/406 .
SFX 29 п бін/407 .
SFX 29 п біс/408 .

# Stems that drop their last vowel before a suffix: `мойын`
# is `мойны`. Only the entries seen to do it carry this flag.

SFX 90 N 24
SFX 90 ыз зы .
SFX 90 ын ны .
SFX 90 ын ным .
SFX 90 ын ныма .
SFX 90 ын нымда .
SFX 90 ын нымды .
SFX 90 ын нымен .
SFX 90 ын нымнан .
SFX 90 ын нымыз .
SFX 90 ын нымыздан .
SFX 90 ын нымызға .
SFX 90 ын нын .
SFX 90 ын нына .
SFX 90 ын нынан .
SFX 90 ын нында .
SFX 90 ын нындағы .
SFX 90 ын ныны .
SFX 90 ын нының .
SFX 90 ын ныға .
SFX 90 ын ның .
SFX 90 ын ныңа .
SFX 90 ын ныңды .
SFX 90 ын ныңнан .
SFX 90 ін ні .

# Level two: the rest of the chain, one string per rule.

SFX 100 N 156
SFX 100 0 й .
SFX 100 0 ймын .
SFX 100 0 йсың .
SFX 100 0 йы .
SFX 100 0 йын .
SFX 100 0 йық .
SFX 100 0 к .
SFX 100 0 л .
SFX 100 0 лы .
SFX 100 0 лылы .
SFX 100 0 лым .
SFX 100 0 лымыз .
SFX 100 0 лын .
SFX 100 0 лына .
SFX 100 0 лыны .
SFX 100 0 лып .
SFX 100 0 лыс .
SFX 100 0 лысы .
SFX 100 0 лығы .
SFX 100 0 лық .
SFX 100 0 лың .
SFX 100 0 м .
SFX 100 0 мда .
SFX 100 0 мдар .
SFX 100 0 мдары .
SFX 100 0 мды .
SFX 100 0 мнан .
SFX 100 0 мның .
SFX 100 0 мыз .
SFX 100 0 мызда .
SFX 100 0 мыздан .
SFX 100 0 мызды .
SFX 100 0 мыздың .
SFX 100 0 мызға .
SFX 100 0 мын .
SFX 100 0 н .
SFX 100 0 ну .
SFX 100 0 пты .
SFX 100 0 р .
SFX 100 0 ра .
SFX 100 0 рады .
SFX 100 0 ратын .
SFX 100 0 рбайды .
SFX 100 0 рда .
SFX 100 0 рдай .
SFX 100 0 рдан .
SFX 100 0 рды .
SFX 100 0 рдың .
SFX 100 0 рлар .
SFX 100 0 рлары .
SFX 100 0 рлау .
SFX 100 0 рлы .
SFX 100 0 рлығын .
SFX 100 0 рлық .
SFX 100 0 рлықтай .
SFX 100 0 рма .
SFX 100 0 рмай .
SFX 100 0 рмайды .
SFX 100 0 рмақ .
SFX 100 0 рмыз .
SFX 100 0 рмын .
SFX 100 0 рса .
SFX 100 0 рсы .
SFX 100 0 рсыз .
SFX 100 0 рсың .
SFX 100 0 рта .
SFX 100 0 ртау .
SFX 100 0 ртын .
SFX 100 0 ру .
SFX 100 0 руші .
SFX 100 0 рша .
SFX 100 0 ршы .
SFX 100 0 ры .
SFX 100 0 рыл .
SFX 100 0 рым .
SFX 100 0 рымыз .
SFX 100 0 рын .
SFX 100 0 рына .
SFX 100 0 рып .
SFX 100 0 рыпты .
SFX 100 0 рыс .
SFX 100 0 рың .
SFX 100 0 рыңыз .
SFX 100 0 рға .
SFX 100 0 рған .
SFX 100 0 рғы .
SFX 100 0 рғыз .
SFX 100 0 с .
SFX 100 0 саң .
SFX 100 0 спа .
SFX 100 0 спын .
SFX 100 0 ссыз .
SFX 100 0 ста .
SFX 100 0 стай .
SFX 100 0 стан .
SFX 100 0 стар .
SFX 100 0 стары .
SFX 100 0 стау .
SFX 100 0 сты .
SFX 100 0 стыр .
SFX 100 0 стық .
SFX 100 0 стың .
SFX 100 0 су .
SFX 100 0 суші .
SFX 100 0 сшы .
SFX 100 0 сы .
SFX 100 0 сыз .
SFX 100 0 сыл .
SFX 100 0 сым .
SFX 100 0 сымыз .
SFX 100 0 сын .
SFX 100 0 сына .
SFX 100 0 сынан .
SFX 100 0 сында .
SFX 100 0 сындағы .
SFX 100 0 сыны .
SFX 100 0 сының .
SFX 100 0 сып .
SFX 100 0 сыпты .
SFX 100 0 сыр .
SFX 100 0 сысы .
SFX 100 0 сың .
SFX 100 0 сыңды .
SFX 100 0 сыңыз .
SFX 100 0 сқа .
SFX 100 0 сқан .
SFX 100 0 т .
SFX 100 0 тпа .
SFX 100 0 тса .
SFX 100 0 тсыз .
SFX 100 0 тта .
SFX 100 0 ттай .
SFX 100 0 ттан .
SFX 100 0 ттар .
SFX 100 0 ттары .
SFX 100 0 ттау .
SFX 100 0 тты .
SFX 100 0 ттың .
SFX 100 0 ту .
SFX 100 0 тша .
SFX 100 0 тшы .
SFX 100 0 ты .
SFX 100 0 тыл .
SFX 100 0 тылы .
SFX 100 0 тым .
SFX 100 0 тып .
SFX 100 0 тысы .
SFX 100 0 тқан .
SFX 100 0 қ .
SFX 100 0 ң .
SFX 100 0 ңда .
SFX 100 0 ңдар .
SFX 100 0 ңдары .
SFX 100 0 ңды .
SFX 100 0 ңнан .
SFX 100 0 ңның .

SFX 101 N 15
SFX 101 0 м .
SFX 101 0 мда .
SFX 101 0 мдар .
SFX 101 0 мдары .
SFX 101 0 мды .
SFX 101 0 мнан .
SFX 101 0 мның .
SFX 101 0 қ .
SFX 101 0 ң .
SFX 101 0 ңда .
SFX 101 0 ңдар .
SFX 101 0 ңдары .
SFX 101 0 ңды .
SFX 101 0 ңнан .
SFX 101 0 ңның .
