dict/kk_KZ.dic
алагеуімден/28
аласәулелен/28
арыз/12,90
ашкөзден/28
ақжемдел/27
ақселеулен/28
ақын/13,90
ақүрпілен/28
бебеуле/25
безеңдеу/26
бейберекеттен/28
бейімдел/27
бекерле/25
белсен/28
беріктел/27
берілме/25
беріштендір/26
беттес/29
билен/28
битте/25
биіктетіңкірет/29
босбелбеулен/28
брикеттел/27
біздеңде/25
білгіз/27
білдір/26
білем/18,28
білемдел/27
білемдет/29
білетінімсі/25
білмен/28
біркелкілен/28
бірле/25
біріктір/26
біріктіріл/27
бітімдес/19,29
бітіргіз/27
бүгіліңкіре/25
бүйректен/28
бүйт/29
бүкжи/25
бүксию/26
бүктел/27
бүкшит/29
бүкіре/25
бүлін/28
бүргіз/27
бүржи/25
бүрк/29
бүркендір/26
бүркіл/27
бүркін/28
бүрле/25
бүте/15,25
бүтіндел/27
бүтінден/28
бұрын/13,90
бәймендеу/26
бәпелеу/26
бәңгіт/29
бөгелеңде/25
бөкендеу/26
бөкселе/25
бөктерлет/29
бөктеріл/27
бөктерін/28
бөлектел/27
бөлент/29
бөлшектен/28
бөпеле/25
бөректіру/26
бөртелет/29
бөріктір/26
гектірле/25
гидрогениздеу/26
гидролизден/28
графиттел/27
гудоктет/29
гүжілдеңкіре/25
гүлдет/29
гүрілде/25
гәпіру/26
гөйіт/29
дегбірлен/28
дегді/25
дегесін/28
дегіз/27
делдиіңкіре/25
делектет/29
делін/28
делір/26
демеңкіре/25
дестену/26
деңгейлес/29
дистилден/28
дірделеңдеу/26
дірілде/25
дүбіл/27
дүрсілдет/29
дүрсілдеуде/25
дүңию/26
дәкеле/25
дәлдулен/28
дәлелденіл/27
дәли/25
дәлір/26
дәмегөйлен/28
дәндет/29
дәнекерлен/28
дәнекерлестір/26
дәріпте/25
дәріптел/27
дәсерлен/28
дәсию/26
дәсірейт/29
дәңгіре/25
дөңбектен/28
дөңбекш/29
дөңгеле/25
дөңден/28
дөңестел/27
ебзеу/26
ез/17,27
езбеле/25
езілт/29
ексу/26
екшел/27
елен/18,28
елеңде/25
елеңсу/26
елшілес/29
емеску/26
еміз/27
емірен/28
еміркену/26
енгізіл/27
ербеңде/25
ерегес/19,29
еренсізден/28
ерею/26
ернеуле/25
ернеулен/28
ес/19,29
есептел/27
есерлен/28
есеңгіре/25
ескір/26
естірт/29
еткіз/27
жареукелен/28
жаркелештену/26
жаукеңде/25
жебелен/28
жегіл/27
жеделдет/29
жезделе/25
жекелен/28
жел/17,27
желбіре/25
желден/28
желдет/29
желеңде/25
желкелет/29
желпі/25
желпін/28
желпінт/29
желімде/25
желімдес/29
желін/18,28
жемдел/27
жентектел/27
жепектету/26
жеркен/28
жерсіндір/26
жерінт/29
жетектел/27
жетелет/29
жетіл/27
жеңгіз/27
жеңдірт/29
жеңсіктен/28
жеңілгенсі/25
жеңілдір/26
жиектел/27
жиектен/28
жирент/29
жолбикелен/28
жіберткіз/27
жіліктел/27
жіліктен/28
жіліктеп/29
жіпси/25
жіңішкер/26
жіңішкерт/29
жүгенсізден/28
жүз/17,27
жүйкелет/29
жүпірле/25
жүргіз/27
жүрексізден/28
жүрелет/29
жәпектет/29
жәпірей/26
жәркелештен/28
жәркелеңде/25
жәукемдес/29
жөндел/27
жөнел/27
жөпектес/29
жөпілде/25
жөргектел/27
жөрмел/27
жөңкеріл/27
жөңкіріл/27
зейнеттел/27
зекір/26
зерлет/29
зерттеңкіре/25
зеңден/28
зәулімден/28
игіз/27
иектес/29
изекте/25
илектел/27
илес/29
индекстел/27
инелу/26
иреңдел/27
исін/28
итермеле/25
итерт/29
иіл/27
иірілт/29
иіскену/26
иіңкіре/25
кебін/18,28
кебіндел/27
кегежектес/29
кедіреңдеу/26
кежеуілде/25
кез/17,27
кездес/29
кезел/27
кезен/28
кезік/19,29
кей/16,26
кекетіңкіре/25
кекжеңдет/29
кекір/16,26
кекірелен/28
кел/17,27
келепте/25
келіншелет/29
кемештел/27
кенел/27
кенелт/29
кепкі/15,25
кепсу/26
кербезгүл/27
кереккен/28
кернел/27
кертию/26
керіс/19,29
кестеле/15,25
кетит/29
кеугімден/28
кеуектел/27
кеукілде/25
кеукілемеу/26
кешеуіл/17,27
кешеуілдет/29
кеңей/26
кеңестен/28
кідіріңкіре/25
кіжірей/26
кіргізіл/27
кірлет/29
кірлігу/26
күйдір/26
күлшеле/25
күнелт/29
күпсу/26
күтімелде/25
күштімсін/28
күшімдеу/26
кәрлен/18,28
кәріз/17,90
кәсіпорын/13,90
кәукілде/25
кәңгір/26
кәңгірлет/29
көйкілдету/26
көкектет/29
көлеңдеу/26
көлкеште/25
көм/28
көмкеріл/27
көнтию/26
лепір/26
магазиндет/29
маркерле/25
мезілен/28
меймілдет/29
мелшит/29
менменсін/28
менсіндір/26
менсініңкіре/25
меншіктел/27
меңгерт/29
меңірей/26
милониттен/28
мойын/13,90
мінгес/29
міңгірле/25
мүсіркеу/26
мұрын/13,90
мәмілелес/29
мәнерлен/28
мәртебеле/25
мәңгүрттендір/26
мөлдектет/29
мөлтеңдет/29
мөңкіңкіре/25
мөңірес/29
негіздел/27
ниеттен/28
ойын/13,90
орын/13,90
ренжіс/29
сездір/26
сейіл/17,27
селеуле/25
семірт/29
сепсу/26
сергектен/28
сиректендір/26
суреттел/27
сілбуле/25
сіркелен/28
сүзірей/26
сүйрет/29
сүр/16,26
сүрмеле/25
сүтін/18,90
сүтіндел/27
сәйкестен/28
сөгіну/26
тегістел/27
тежет/29
тексер/26
темірле/25
тепкілен/28
теңкел/27
теңшеу/26
тигіз/27
тигізбе/25
тиіс/19,29
тізбектел/27
тімтін/28
тіргіз/27
тісте/25
түзел/27
түйткілжу/26
түйін/18,28
түйіс/29
түне/25
түргіз/27
түсіндір/26
тәйтектеу/26
тәржімеле/25
тәртіпсізден/28
тәртіптел/27
төбелес/19,29
төсел/27
төсен/28
төңкер/26
уағыз/12,90
уыз/12,90
уһіле/25
шалын/23,90
шелию/26
шеш/29
шешімдел/27
шешін/28,90
шіміркен/28
шіре/25
шүйлігу/26
шәктену/26
шөму/26
ілбі/25
ірк/29
іркіл/27
іскеу/26
іштен/28
қарын/13,90
қаңғылесте/25
қойын/13,90
қошеметтен/28
үдірей/26
үзіл/27
үйрет/29
үйігу/26
үпілеу/26
үркі/25
үрлен/28
әзірле/25
әкет/29
әктел/27
әкімшілдендіру/26
әлден/18,28
әуеле/25
әумеңдеу/26
әурелен/28
өксі/25
өкімдеу/26
өкірт/29
өліеттен/28
өрегзу/26
өрісте/25
өтел/17,27
өшік/29
өңезелен/28
